Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-108.01
Electioneering, defined.

(1) Electioneering means the deliberate, visible display or audible or physical dissemination of information for the purpose of advocating for or against:

(a) Any candidate for an office on the ballot for the election at which such display or dissemination is occurring;

(b) Any officeholder of an elected state constitutional office or federal office at the time of the election at which such display or dissemination is occurring; or

(c) Any political party on the ballot for the election at which such display or dissemination is occurring.

(2) For purposes of this section, information includes: (a) A candidate's name, likeness, logo, or symbol; (b) a button, hat, pencil, pen, shirt, sign, or sticker containing information described by this section; and (c) audible information or any literature, writing, or drawing referring to a candidate, an officeholder, or a political party described in this section.

Laws 2024, LB287, § 9.